Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 4 BENEFITS
§ 72-432. Medical services, appliances and supplies — Reports.

Subject to the provisions of section 72-706, Idaho Code, the employer shall provide for an injured employee such reasonable medical, surgical or other attendance or treatment, nurse and hospital services, medicines, crutches and apparatus, as may be reasonably required by the employee’s physician or needed immediately after an injury or manifestation of an occupational disease, and for a reasonable time thereafter. If the employer fails to provide the same, the injured employee may do so at the expense of the employer.

The employer shall also furnish necessary replacements or repairs of appliances and prostheses, unless the need therefor is due to lack of proper care by the employee. If the appliance or prosthesis is damaged or destroyed in an industrial accident, the employer, for whom the employee was working at the time of accident, will be liable for replacement or repair, but not for any subsequent replacement or repair not directly resulting from the accident.

In addition to the income benefits otherwise payable, the employee who is entitled to income benefits shall be paid an additional sum in an amount as may be determined by the commission as by it deemed necessary, as a medical service, when the constant service of an attendant is necessary by reason of total blindness of the employee or the loss of both hands or both feet or the loss of use thereof, or by reason of being paralyzed and unable to walk, or by reason of other disability resulting from the injury or disease actually rendering him so helpless as to require constant attendance. The commission shall have authority to determine the necessity, character and sufficiency of any medical services furnished or to be furnished and shall have authority to order a change of physician, hospital or rehabilitation facility when in its judgment such change is desirable or necessary.

The employee upon reasonable grounds, may petition the commission for a change of physician to be provided by the employer; however, the employee must give written notice to the employer or surety of the employee’s request for a change of physicians to afford the employer the opportunity to fulfill its obligations under this section. If proper notice is not given, the employer shall not be obligated to pay for the services obtained. Nothing in this section shall limit the attending physician from arranging for consultation, referral or specialized care without permission of the employer. Upon receiving such written notice, the employer shall render its written decision on the claimant’s request within fourteen (14) days. If any dispute arises over the issue of a request for change of physician, the industrial commission shall conduct an expedited hearing to determine whether or not the request for change of physician should be granted, and shall render a decision within fourteen (14) days after the filing of the response by the employer.
(4)(a) The employee upon reasonable grounds, may petition the commission for a change of physician to be provided by the employer; however, the employee must give written notice to the employer or surety of the employee’s request for a change of physicians to afford the employer the opportunity to fulfill its obligations under this section. If proper notice is not given, the employer shall not be obligated to pay for the services obtained. Nothing in this section shall limit the attending physician from arranging for consultation, referral or specialized care without permission of the employer. Upon receiving such written notice, the employer shall render its written decision on the claimant’s request within fourteen (14) days. If any dispute arises over the issue of a request for change of physician, the industrial commission shall conduct an expedited hearing to determine whether or not the request for change of physician should be granted, and shall render a decision within fourteen (14) days after the filing of the response by the employer.

The industrial commission shall, no later than December 31, 1997, promulgate a rule for the expeditious handling of a petition for change of physician pursuant to this section. Nothing herein shall prevent the commission from making periodic amendments, as may become necessary, to any rule for a petition for change of physician.

Any employee who seeks medical care in a manner not provided for in this section, or as ordered by the industrial commission pursuant to this section, shall not be entitled to reimbursement for costs of such care.

No provider shall engage in balance billing as defined in section 72-102, Idaho Code.

An employee shall not be responsible for charges of physicians, hospitals or other providers of medical services to whom he has been referred for treatment of his injury or occupational disease by an employer designated physician or by the commission, except for charges for personal items or extended services which the employee has requested for his convenience and which are not required for treatment of his injury or occupational disease.

The employer or surety shall not be subject to tort liability to any health care provider for complying with the provisions of this law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a workman who in good faith relies on Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner to undergo any medical or surgical treatment, providing that neither he nor his dependents shall be entitled to income benefits of any kind beyond those reasonably expected to have been paid had he undergone medical or surgical treatment, and the employer or insurance carrier may pay for such spiritual treatment.

The commission shall promulgate rules requiring physicians and other practitioners providing treatment to make regular reports to the commission containing such information as may be required by the commission. The commission shall promulgate such rules with the counsel, advice, cooperation and expertise of representatives of industry, labor, sureties and the legal and medical professions as well as institutions, hospitals and clinics having physical rehabilitation facilities.

All medical information relevant to or bearing upon a particular injury or occupational disease shall be provided to the employer, surety, manager of the industrial special indemnity fund, or their attorneys or authorized representatives, the claimant, the claimant’s attorneys or authorized representatives, or the commission without liability on the part of the physician, hospital or other provider of medical services and information developed in connection with treatment or examination for an injury or disease for which compensation is sought shall not be privileged communication. When a physician or hospital willfully fails to make a report required under this section, after written notice by the commission that such report is due, the commission may order forfeiture of all or part of payments due for services rendered in connection with the particular case. An attorney representing the employer, surety, claimant or industrial special indemnity fund shall have the right to confer with any health care provider without the presence of the opposing attorney, representative or party, except for a health care provider who is retained only as an expert witness.

Physicians or others providing services under this section shall assist in the rehabilitation program provided in section 72-501A, Idaho Code. They shall cooperate with specialists from the commission’s rehabilitation staff and with employer rehabilitation personnel in furthering the physical or vocational rehabilitation of the employee. The extension of total temporary disability benefits during retraining as authorized by section 72-450, Idaho Code, shall be the responsibility of the commission, however, the physician shall inform the commission as soon as it is medically apparent that the employee may be unable to return to the job in which he sustained injury or occupational disease following treatment and maximum recovery.

An injured employee shall be reimbursed for his expenses of necessary travel in obtaining medical care under this section. Reimbursement for transportation expenses, if the employee utilizes a private vehicle, shall be at the mileage rate allowed by the state board of examiners for state employees; provided however, that the employee shall not be reimbursed for the first fifteen (15) miles of any round trip, nor for traveling any round trip of fifteen (15) miles or less. Such distance shall be calculated by the shortest practical route of travel.
(14) An employee who leaves the locality where employed at the time of the industrial accident, or manifestation of an occupational disease, or the locality in which the employee is currently receiving medical treatment for the injury, shall give timely notice to the employer and surety of the employee’s leaving the locality. The employer or surety may require the claimant to report to the treating physician for examination prior to leaving the locality, if practical. If an examination by the treating physician is not practical prior to leaving the locality, the employer or surety may assist in arranging an examination by an appropriate physician in the new locality. After receiving notice of relocation, the employer or surety shall have the same responsibility to furnish care as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

§ 72-433. Submission of injured employee to medical examination or physical rehabilitation.

After an injury or contraction of an occupational disease and during the period of disability the employee, if requested by the employer or ordered by the commission, shall submit himself for examination at reasonable times and places to a duly qualified physician or surgeon. The employee shall be reimbursed for his expenses of necessary travel and subsistence in submitting himself for any such examination and for loss of wages, if any. For purposes of this section, the reimbursement for loss of wages shall be at the employee’s then current rate of pay if the employee is then working; otherwise, such reimbursement shall be at the total temporary disability rate. Reimbursement for travel expenses, if the employee utilizes a private vehicle, shall be at the mileage rate allowed by the state board of examiners for state employees; provided, however, that the employee shall not be reimbursed for the first fifteen (15) miles of any round trip, nor for traveling any round trip distance of fifteen (15) miles or less. Such distance shall be calculated by the shortest practical route of travel.

The employee shall have the right to have a physician or surgeon designated and paid by himself present at an examination by a physician or surgeon so designated by the employer. Such right, however, shall not be construed to deny the employer’s designated physician or surgeon the right to visit the injured employee during reasonable times and under all reasonable conditions during disability. The employee and the examining physician shall have the right to have an audio recording of any examination, but may have a video recording only if the examining physician and the employee consent.

At any time after injury, if an injured employee be sent to a facility approved by the commission for physical or vocational rehabilitation, the employee shall be furnished by the employer reasonable travel accommodations to and from such facility and if the injured employee is an outpatient in a physical rehabilitation facility, he shall be paid daily subsistence as the commission may authorize to cover reasonable expenses of board, lodging and transportation. Reimbursement for transportation expense, if the employee utilizes a private vehicle, shall be at the mileage rate allowed by the state board of examiners for state employees; provided however, that the employee shall not be reimbursed for the first fifteen (15) miles of any round trip, nor for traveling any round trip distance of fifteen (15) miles or less. Such distance shall be calculated by the shortest practical route of travel.

§ 72-434. Effect of refusing medical examination — Discontinuance of compensation.

If an injured employee unreasonably fails to submit to or in any way obstructs an examination by a physician or surgeon designated by the commission or the employer, the injured employee’s right to take or prosecute any proceedings under this law shall be suspended until such failure or obstruction ceases, and no compensation shall be payable for the period during which such failure or obstruction continues.

§ 72-435. Injurious practices — Suspension or reduction of compensation.

If an injured employee persists in unsanitary or unreasonable practices which tend to imperil or retard his recovery the commission may order the compensation of such employee to be suspended or reduced.

§ 72-436. Burial expenses.

If death results from the injury within four (4) years, the employer shall pay to the person entitled to compensation, or if there is none then to the personal representative of the deceased employee, the actual amount of burial expenses as defined in section 72-102(4), Idaho Code.

§ 72-437. Occupational diseases — Right to compensation.

When an employee of an employer suffers an occupational disease and is thereby disabled from performing his work in the last occupation in which he was injuriously exposed to the hazards of such disease, or dies as a result of such disease, and the disease was due to the nature of an occupation or process in which he was employed within the period previous to his disablement as hereinafter limited, the employee, or, in case of his death, his dependents shall be entitled to compensation.

§ 72-438. Occupational diseases.

Compensation shall be payable for disability or death of an employee resulting from the following occupational diseases:

Poisoning by lead, mercury, arsenic, zinc, or manganese, their preparations or compounds in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Carbon monoxide poisoning or chlorine poisoning in any process or occupation involving direct exposure to carbon monoxide or chlorine in buildings, sheds, or enclosed places.

Poisoning by methanol, carbon bisulphide, hydrocarbon distillates (naphthas and others) or halogenated hydrocarbons, or any preparations containing these chemicals or any of them, in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Poisoning by benzol or by nitro, amido, or amino-derivatives of benzol (dinitro-benzol, anilin and others) or their preparations or compounds in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Glanders in the care or handling of any equine animal or the carcass of any such animal.

Radium poisoning by or disability due to radioactive properties of substances or to roentgen ray (X-ray) in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Poisoning by or ulceration from chromic acid or bichromate of ammonium, potassium, or sodium or their preparations, or phosphorus preparations or compounds, in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Ulceration due to tar, pitch, bitumen, mineral oil, or paraffin, or any compound product, or residue of any of these substances, in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Dermatitis venenata, that is, infection or inflammation of the skin, furunculosis excepted, due to oils, cutting compounds, lubricants, liquids, fumes, gases, or vapors in any occupation involving direct contact therewith, handling thereof, or exposure thereto.

Anthrax occurring in any occupation involving the handling of or exposure to wool, hair, bristles, hides, skins, or bodies of animals either alive or dead.

Silicosis in any occupation involving direct contact with, handling of, or exposure to dust of silicon dioxide (SiO
).

Cardiovascular or pulmonary or respiratory diseases of a firefighter, employed by or volunteering for a municipality, village or fire district as a regular member of a lawfully established fire department, caused by overexertion in times of stress or danger or by proximate exposure or by cumulative exposure over a period of four (4) years or more to heat, smoke, chemical fumes or other toxic gases arising directly out of, and in the course of, his employment.

Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), AIDS-related complexes (ARC), other manifestations of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infections, infectious hepatitis viruses and tuberculosis in any occupation involving exposure to human blood or body fluids.

Firefighter occupational diseases:

As used in this subsection, “firefighter” means an employee whose primary duty is that of extinguishing or investigating fires as part of a fire district, fire department or fire brigade.
(b) If a firefighter is diagnosed with one (1) or more of the following diseases after the period of employment indicated in subparagraphs (i) through (xi) of this paragraph, and the disease was not revealed during an initial employment medical screening examination that was performed according to such standards and conditions as may be established at the sole discretion of the governing board having authority over a given fire district, fire department, or fire brigade, then the disease shall be presumed to be proximately caused by the firefighter’s employment as a firefighter:

Brain cancer after ten (10) years;

Bladder cancer after twelve (12) years;

Kidney cancer after fifteen (15) years;

Colorectal cancer after ten (10) years;

Non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma after fifteen (15) years;

Leukemia after five (5) years;

Mesothelioma after ten (10) years;

Testicular cancer after five (5) years if diagnosed before the age of forty (40) years with no evidence of anabolic steroids or human growth hormone use;

Breast cancer after five (5) years if diagnosed before the age of forty (40) years without a breast cancer 1 or breast cancer 2 genetic predisposition to breast cancer;

Esophageal cancer after ten (10) years; and

Multiple myeloma after fifteen (15) years.

2

(c) The presumption created in this subsection may be overcome by substantial evidence to the contrary. If the presumption is overcome by substantial evidence, then the firefighter or the beneficiaries must prove that the firefighter’s disease was caused by his or her duties of employment.

(d) The presumption created in this subsection shall not preclude a firefighter from demonstrating a causal connection between employment and disease or injury by a preponderance of evidence before the Idaho industrial commission.

(e) The presumption created in this subsection shall not apply to any specified disease diagnosed more than ten (10) years following the last date on which the firefighter actually worked as a firefighter as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection. Nor shall the presumption apply if a firefighter or a firefighter’s cohabitant has regularly and habitually used tobacco products for ten (10) or more years prior to the diagnosis.

(f) The periods of employment described in paragraph (b) of this subsection refer to periods of employment within the state of Idaho.

Recognizing that additional toxic or harmful substances or matter are continually being discovered and used or misused, the above enumerated occupational diseases are not intended to be exclusive, but such additional diseases shall not include hazards that are common to the public in general and that are not within the meaning of section 72-102(22)(a), Idaho Code, and the diseases enumerated in subsection (12) of this section pertaining to firefighters shall not be subject to the limitations prescribed in section 72-439, Idaho Code.

§ 72-439. Actually incurred/nonacute occupational disease.

An employer shall not be liable for any compensation for an occupational disease unless such disease is actually incurred in the employer’s employment.

An employer shall not be liable for any compensation for a nonacute occupational disease unless the employee was exposed to the hazard of such disease for a period of sixty (60) days for the same employer.

Where compensation is payable for an occupational disease, the employer, or the surety on the risk for the employer, in whose employment the employee was last injuriously exposed to the hazard of such disease, shall be liable therefor.

§ 72-440. Time of dependency — Death benefits.

No compensation for death from an occupational disease shall be payable to any person whose relationship to the deceased, which would give right to compensation, arose subsequent to the beginning of the first compensable disability, save only to posthumous children of a marriage existing at the beginning of such disability.

§ 72-441. No compensation in case of misrepresentation.

No compensation shall be payable for an occupational disease if the employee, at the time of entering into the employment of the employer by whom the compensation would otherwise be payable, falsely represented himself in writing as not having previously been disabled, laid off, or compensated in damages or otherwise because of such disease.

§ 72-442. Wilful self-exposure. [Repealed.]

§ 72-443. Period of exposure in silicosis cases.

No claim for disability or death from silicosis shall be maintained or prosecuted unless during the ten (10) years immediately preceding the date of disablement the employee has been exposed to the inhalation of silica dust over a period of not less than five (5) years, the last two (2) of which shall have been in this state, under a contract of employment existing in this state, provided, that if the employee shall have been employed by the same employer during the whole of such five (5) year period his right to compensation against such employer shall not be affected by the fact that he had been employed during any part of such period outside of this state.

§ 72-444. No compensation for partial disability from silicosis.

Compensation shall not be payable for partial disability due to silicosis.

§ 72-445. Compensation for total disability or death from complicated silicosis.

In case of disability or death from silicosis, complicated with tuberculosis of the lungs, income benefits shall be payable as for uncomplicated silicosis, provided, that the silicosis was an essential factor in causing such disability or death. In case of disability or death from silicosis complicated with any other disease, or from any other disease complicated with silicosis, the income benefits shall be reduced as provided in section 72-406[, Idaho Code].

Partial Disability.

If disability was only partial, and no showing of tuberculosis, an award was not justified. Shumaker v. Hunter Lease & Gold Hunter Mines, 72 Idaho 173, 238 P.2d 425 (1951).

§ 72-446. Nondisabling silicosis — Compensation upon severance from employment.

When an employee, because he has nondisabling silicosis, is discharged from employment in which he is engaged, or when such an employee, after an examination as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and a finding by the medical panel that it is inadvisable for him to continue in his employment, terminates his employment, the commission may allow such compensation on account of such termination of employment as it may deem just, as support money pending his change of employment, payable as in this law elsewhere provided, but in no case to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Upon application of any employer or employee, the commission may direct any employee of such employer or any employee who, in the course of his employment has been exposed to the inhalation of silica dust, to submit to a medical examination to determine whether the employee has silicosis, and the degree thereof. The results of the examination shall be submitted to the commission, which shall submit copies of such reports to the employer and employee, who shall have opportunity to rebut the same, provided, request therefor is made to the commission within thirty (30) days from the mailing of such report to the parties. The commission shall make its findings as to whether it is inadvisable for the employee to continue in his employment.

§ 72-447. Recurring dermatitis.

A person who has suffered disability from dermatitis and has received income benefits therefor shall not be entitled to income benefits for disability from a later attack of dermatitis due to substantially the same cause, unless immediately preceding the date of the later disablement he has been engaged in the occupation to which the recurrence of the disease is ascribed and under the same employer for at least sixty (60) days.

§ 72-448. Notice and limitations.

Unless written notice of the manifestation of an occupational disease is given to the employer within sixty (60) days after its first manifestation, or to the industrial commission if the employer cannot be reasonably located within ninety (90) days after the first manifestation, and unless claim for worker’s compensation benefits for an occupational disease is filed with the industrial commission within one (1) year after the first manifestation, all rights of the employee to worker’s compensation due to the occupational disease shall be forever barred.

Unless written notice of death from an occupational disease is given to the employer within ninety (90) days after the death, or to the industrial commission if the employer cannot be reasonably located within ninety (90) days after the death, and unless claim for worker’s compensation benefits for the death is filed with the industrial commission within one (1) year after the death, all rights to worker’s compensation benefits for the death shall be forever barred.

If notice is given to the industrial commission under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the industrial commission shall promptly give notice to the employer and the surety.

§ 72-449. Post mortem examination.

Upon the filing of a claim for compensation for death from an occupational disease when an autopsy is necessary accurately and scientifically to ascertain and determine the cause of death, the autopsy shall be ordered by the commission. The commission may designate a duly licensed physician, who is a specialist in such examination, to perform or attend the autopsy and to certify his findings thereon. Such findings shall be filed with the commission and shall be a public record. The commission also may exercise such authority on its own motion or on application made to it at any time by any party in interest, in regard to the cause of death or the existence of any occupational disease. All proceedings for compensation shall be suspended upon refusal of a claimant or claimants to permit such autopsy when so ordered, and no compensation shall be payable during the continuance of such refusal.

§ 72-450. Retraining.

Following a hearing upon a motion of the employer, the employee, or the commission, if the commission deems a permanently disabled employee, after the period of recovery, is receptive to and in need of retraining in another field, skill or vocation in order to restore his earning capacity, the commission may authorize or order such retraining and during the period of retraining or any extension thereof, the employer shall continue to pay the disabled employee, as a subsistence benefit, temporary total or temporary partial disability benefits as the case may be. The period of retraining shall be fixed by the commission but shall not exceed fifty-two (52) weeks unless the commission, following application and hearing, deems it advisable to extend the period of retraining, in which case the increased period shall not exceed fifty-two (52) weeks. An employer and employee may mutually agree to a retraining program without the necessity of a hearing before the commission.

§ 72-451. Psychological accidents and injuries. [Null and void, effective July 1, 2023.]

Psychological injuries, disorders or conditions shall not be compensated under this title, unless the following conditions are met:

Such injuries of any kind or nature emanating from the workplace shall be compensated only if caused by accident and physical injury as defined in section 72-102(18)(a) through (18)(c), Idaho Code, or only if accompanying an occupational disease with resultant physical injury, except that a psychological mishap or event may constitute an accident where:

It results in resultant physical injury as long as the psychological mishap or event meets the other criteria of this section;

It is readily recognized and identifiable as having occurred in the workplace; and

It must be the product of a sudden and extraordinary event;

No compensation shall be paid for such injuries arising from conditions generally inherent in every working situation or from a personnel-related action including, but not limited to, disciplinary action, changes in duty, job evaluation or employment termination;

Such accident and injury must be the predominant cause as compared to all other causes combined of any consequence for which benefits are claimed under this section;

Where psychological causes or injuries are recognized by this section, such causes or injuries must exist in a real and objective sense;

Any permanent impairment or permanent disability for psychological injury recognizable under the Idaho worker’s compensation law must be based on a condition sufficient to constitute a diagnosis using the terminology and criteria of the American psychiatric association’s diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, third edition revised, or any successor manual promulgated by the American psychiatric association, and must be made by a psychologist or psychiatrist duly licensed to practice in the jurisdiction in which treatment is rendered; and

Clear and convincing evidence that the psychological injuries arose out of and in the course of the employment from an accident or occupational disease as contemplated in this section is required.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed as allowing compensation for psychological injuries from psychological causes without accompanying physical injury.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to accidents and injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994, and to causes of action for benefits accruing on or after July 1, 1994, notwithstanding that the original worker’s compensation claim may have occurred prior to July 1, 1994.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, post-traumatic stress injury suffered by a first responder is a compensable injury or occupational disease when the following conditions are met:

The first responder is examined and subsequently diagnosed with post-traumatic stress injury by a psychologist, a psychiatrist duly licensed to practice in the jurisdiction where treatment is rendered, or a counselor trained in post-traumatic stress injury; and

Clear and convincing evidence indicates that the post-traumatic stress injury was caused by an event or events arising out of and in the course of the first responder’s employment.

No compensation shall be paid for such injuries described in subsection (2) of this section arising from a personnel-related action including, but not limited to, disciplinary action, changes in duty, job evaluation, or employment termination.
(6) As used in subsection (4) of this section:

“Post-traumatic stress injury” means a disorder that meets the diagnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder or post-traumatic stress injury specified by the American psychiatric association’s diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, fifth edition revised, or any successor manual promulgated by the American psychiatric association.

“First responder” means:

A peace officer as defined in section 19-5101(d), Idaho Code, when employed by a city, county, or the Idaho state police;

A firefighter as defined in sections 59-1391(f) and 72-1403(A), Idaho Code;

A volunteer emergency responder as defined in section 72-102(32), Idaho Code;

An emergency medical service provider, or EMS provider, certified by the department of health and welfare pursuant to sections 56-1011 through 56-1018B, Idaho Code, and an ambulance-based clinician as defined in the rules governing emergency medical services as adopted by the department of health and welfare; and

An emergency communications officer as defined in section 19-5101(f), Idaho Code.

(7) Subsections (4) through (6) of this section are effective for first responders with dates of injury or manifestations of occupational disease on or after July 1, 2019.